Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.080

Vacancies on commission—How filled.

In the event a position becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, such position, until the next annual nominating meeting, shall be filled by vote of the remaining members of the commission. Following the next annual nomination meeting, the director shall appoint one of the two nominees selected by advisory ballot to fill the balance of the unexpired term.

[ 2003 c 396 s 20; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.080. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.